src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbstems   !!= * __@CODE@__
пуэдтӭ:пуэдт PUEDTE "come" ;
тӣдтӭ:тӣдт PUEDTE "знать" ;
луввтъе:луввт LUVTTE ; ! = sme contr, no CG
куллэ:кулл KULLE ; !This is Kurutsh 1 = sme even
уййнэ:уййн KULLE ;
аллькэ:алльк DPAL_V ;
по̄ррэ:по̄рр 1 "есть, кушать / to eat";
е̄лле:е̄лл 1 "жить/ to live" ;
о̄дзэ:о̄дэ 1 "искать/ to look for" ; ! Does not generate inf!
уссэ:усс 1 "собирать / to gather" ;
выдзэ:выдз 1 "хныкать / ??" ;
па̄шшьтэ:па̄шшьт 2 "жарить/ to fry" ;
аббрэ:аббр 2 "идти - о дожде / to rain" ;
не̄сськэ:не̄сськ 2 "скоблить/ to scrape" ;
са̄ррнэ:са̄ррн 2 "говорить/ to speak" ;
ва̄ннҍцэ:ва̄ннҍц 2 ;
тӯййшэ:тӯййш 3 "строить / to build" ;
суввдэ:суввд 3 "дымить / to smoke (of a fire)" ;
кӯссьхэ:кӯссьх 3 "угощать / to treat to" ;
сугклэ:сугкл 3 "начать грести / to begin to row" ;
шурьнэ:шурьн 4 "увеличить / to increase (??vi)" ;
суэлнэ:суэлн 4 "воровать / to steal" ;
сухтэ:сухт 4 "заставить грести / to have someone row" ;
поҏтэ:поҏт 4 "кормить / to feed" ;
ёҏтэ:ёҏт 4 "уронить / to drop" ;
пэӆтэ:пэӆт 4 "пугать / to frighten" ;
аббръэ:аббръ 5 "пойти - о дожде / to begin to rain" ;
а̄ввтлэ:а̄ввтл 5 "погреть / to warm up (??vi)" ;
а̄ррьвдэ:а̄ррьвд 5 "угадать / to guess" ;
кырьйхэ:кырьйх 5 "писать / to write" ;
огкнушшэ:огкнушш 6 "застыдиться / to be ashamed" ;
ро̄бхушшэ:ро̄бхушш 6 "работать / to work" ;
вуаллктэллэ:вуаллктэлл 6 "бросать / to throw" ;
а̄ммьсассьтэ:а̄ммьсассьт 7 "завнуть ?? зевнуть / to yawn" ;
оаввнэннтэ:оаввнэннт 7 "открываться / to open up (vi)" ;
лыһкэ:лыһк ELAN_V ;
кӯссьтэ:кӯссьт ELAN_V ; 
моайнсэ:моайнс ELAN_V ;
ыбе:ыб OAHPA_V ;
выйе:вый OAHPA_V ;
пыйе:пый OAHPA_V ;
вӯйе:вӯй OAHPA_V ;
быдт:быд OAHPA_V ;
угкэ:угк OAHPA_V ;
югкэ:югк OAHPA_V ;
уммэ:умм OAHPA_V ;
югсэ:югс OAHPA_V ;
юксэ:юкс OAHPA_V ;
ансэ:анс OAHPA_V ;
юхтэ:юхт OAHPA_V ;
элля:элл OAHPA_V ;
вӣдже:вӣдж OAHPA_V ;
чӯдзе:чӯдз OAHPA_V ;
та̄йе:та̄й OAHPA_V ;
вэ̄йе:вэ̄й OAHPA_V ;
ю̄гке:ю̄гк OAHPA_V ;
шылле:шылл OAHPA_V ;
пӯлле:пӯлл OAHPA_V ;
я̄мме:я̄мм OAHPA_V ;
тыввэ:тывв OAHPA_V ;
тӣввэ:тӣвв OAHPA_V ;
о̄дзэ:о̄дз OAHPA_V ;
ю̄гкэ:ю̄гк OAHPA_V ;
сугкэ:сугк OAHPA_V ;
падкэ:падк OAHPA_V ;
куллэ:кулл OAHPA_V ;
пэллэ:пэлл OAHPA_V ;
пайнэ:пайн OAHPA_V ;
пыйнэ:пыйн OAHPA_V ;
а̄ннэ:а̄нн OAHPA_V ;
чиннэ:чинн OAHPA_V ;
ыштнэ:ыштн OAHPA_V ;
тубпэ:тубп OAHPA_V ;
каррэ:карр OAHPA_V ;
оаррэ:оарр OAHPA_V ;
сӣррэ:сӣрр OAHPA_V ;
чӯмсэ:чӯмс OAHPA_V ;
эӆпсэ:эӆпс OAHPA_V ;
карсэ:карс OAHPA_V ;
сӣрсэ:сӣрс OAHPA_V ;
оассэ:оасс OAHPA_V ;
е̄дтэ:е̄дт OAHPA_V ;
ышштэ:ышшт OAHPA_V ;
шӯштэ:шӯшт OAHPA_V ;
кархэ:карх OAHPA_V ;
вӣршэ:вӣрш OAHPA_V ;
оаннӭ:оанн OAHPA_V ;
ёадтӭ:ёадт OAHPA_V ;
кэ̄дже:кэ̄дж OAHPA_V ;
па̄гке:па̄гк OAHPA_V ;
ца̄гке:ца̄гк OAHPA_V ;
пе̄гке:пе̄гк OAHPA_V ;
пайгке:пайгк OAHPA_V ;
цыӊӊке:цыӊӊк OAHPA_V ;
выййле:выййл OAHPA_V ;
ла̄лле:ла̄лл OAHPA_V ;
альмсе:альмс OAHPA_V ;
ке̄ссе:ке̄сс OAHPA_V ;
аппьсе:аппьс OAHPA_V ;
кӣххче:кӣххч OAHPA_V ;
мешшъе:мешшъ OAHPA_V ;
тӯллье:тӯлль OAHPA_V ;
тӯррье:тӯррь OAHPA_V ;
луввдэ:луввд OAHPA_V ;
а̄вьдэ:а̄вьд OAHPA_V ;
ло̄гкэ:ло̄гк OAHPA_V ;
ря̄гкэ:ря̄гк OAHPA_V ;
чӯййкэ:чӯййк OAHPA_V ;
лыххкэ:лыххк OAHPA_V ;
сыххкэ:сыххк OAHPA_V ;
подтлэ:подтл OAHPA_V ;
ышштлэ:ышштл OAHPA_V ;
паййнэ:паййн OAHPA_V ;
ручкнэ:ручкн OAHPA_V ;
касснэ:кассн OAHPA_V ;
а̄йтнэ:а̄йтн OAHPA_V ;
лӯнтнэ:лӯнтн OAHPA_V ;
альтнэ:альтн OAHPA_V ;
кашшнэ:кашшн OAHPA_V ;
ра̄бпэ:ра̄бп OAHPA_V ;
це̄бпэ:це̄бп OAHPA_V ;
хоӈкрэ:хоӈкр OAHPA_V ;
пе̄ррэ:пе̄рр OAHPA_V ;
ко̄ррэ:ко̄рр OAHPA_V ;
куаррэ:куарр OAHPA_V ;
вӯввсэ:вӯввс OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвсэ:тӣрвс OAHPA_V ;
во̄ссэ:во̄сс OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄ссэ:пэ̄сс OAHPA_V ;
по̄ҏсэ:по̄ҏс OAHPA_V ;
ка̄дтэ:ка̄дт OAHPA_V ;
ло̄дтэ:ло̄дт OAHPA_V ;
тӯллтэ:тӯллт OAHPA_V ;
суннтэ:суннт OAHPA_V ;
чисстэ:чисст OAHPA_V ;
кӯсстэ:кӯсст OAHPA_V ;
чиххтэ:чиххт OAHPA_V ;
шӣххтэ:шӣххт OAHPA_V ;
ыррштэ:ырршт OAHPA_V ;
юррьтэ:юррьт OAHPA_V ;
аннҍтэ:аннҍт OAHPA_V ;
по̄ҏтэ:по̄ҏт OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвхэ:тӣрвх OAHPA_V ;
хабпхэ:хабпх OAHPA_V ;
вӯзьхэ:вӯзьх OAHPA_V ;
кӯсьхэ:кӯсьх OAHPA_V ;
луннцэ:луннц OAHPA_V ;
ле̄шшэ:ле̄шш OAHPA_V ;
вуэӈӈэ:вуэӈӈ OAHPA_V ;
суэӈӈэ:суэӈӈ OAHPA_V ;
тя̄дтӭ:тя̄дт OAHPA_V ;
вуэдтӭ:вуэдт OAHPA_V ;
кя̄ййве:кя̄ййв OAHPA_V ;
ся̄ййве:ся̄ййв OAHPA_V ;
вӯлльке:вӯлльк OAHPA_V ;
цыррьке:цыррьк OAHPA_V ;
я̄ккьсе:я̄ккьс OAHPA_V ;
вӯккьсе:вӯккьс OAHPA_V ;
харпьсе:харпьс OAHPA_V ;
вуэпьсе:вуэпьс OAHPA_V ;
чуэннче:чуэннч OAHPA_V ;
ко̄ппче:ко̄ппч OAHPA_V ;
кэ̄ххче:кэ̄ххч OAHPA_V ;
коадзъе:коадзъ OAHPA_V ;
луввтъе:луввтъ OAHPA_V ;
лыввтъе:лыввтъ OAHPA_V ;
мушштъе:мушштъ OAHPA_V ;
ро̄дтҍе:ро̄дтҍ OAHPA_V ;
суэллдэ:суэллд OAHPA_V ;
рэ̄ӎэдэ:рэ̄ӎэд OAHPA_V ;
соа̄гкэ:соа̄гк OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄рркэ:пэ̄ррк OAHPA_V ;
па̄ххкэ:па̄ххк OAHPA_V ;
вэ̄ццкэ:вэ̄ццк OAHPA_V ;
ко̄шшкэ:ко̄шшк OAHPA_V ;
вӯллькэ:вӯлльк OAHPA_V ;
лаффькэ:лаффьк OAHPA_V ;
хо̄ҏҏкэ:хо̄ҏҏк OAHPA_V ;
ся̄ӈӈкэ:ся̄ӈӈк OAHPA_V ;
вуаӈӈкэ:вуаӈӈк OAHPA_V ;
ла̄ввлэ:ла̄ввл OAHPA_V ;
лыххклэ:лыххкл OAHPA_V ;
по̄ррлэ:по̄ррл OAHPA_V ;
куллтлэ:куллтл OAHPA_V ;
мушштлэ:мушштл OAHPA_V ;
цо̄ввнэ:цо̄ввн OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄ййнэ:пэ̄ййн OAHPA_V ;
куххкнэ:куххкн OAHPA_V ;
э̄ллтнэ:э̄ллтн OAHPA_V ;
луннтнэ:луннтн OAHPA_V ;
лаппьсэ:лаппьс OAHPA_V ;
ло̄хктэ:ло̄хкт OAHPA_V ;
шэ̄ннтэ:шэ̄ннт OAHPA_V ;
луэннтэ:луэннт OAHPA_V ;
та̄ххтэ:та̄ххт OAHPA_V ;
кыппьтэ:кыппьт OAHPA_V ;
кыррьтэ:кыррьт OAHPA_V ;
мушшьтэ:мушшьт OAHPA_V ;
оа̄ҏҏтэ:оа̄ҏҏт OAHPA_V ;
це̄ҏҏтэ:це̄ҏҏт OAHPA_V ;
тӯльтхэ:тӯльтх OAHPA_V ;
вэ̄зьхэ:вэ̄зьх OAHPA_V ;
цыррмшэ:цыррмш OAHPA_V ;
оа̄нтшэ:оа̄нтш OAHPA_V ;
поа̄шшэ:поа̄шш OAHPA_V ;
ла̄ндтӭ:ла̄ндт OAHPA_V ;
рисэвайе:рисэвай OAHPA_V ;
це̄ӆӆьке:це̄ӆӆьк OAHPA_V ;
чуэннчле:чуэннчл OAHPA_V ;
поа̄вчсе:поа̄вчс OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄ҏҏкъе:пэ̄ҏҏкъ OAHPA_V ;
тӯлльтъе:тӯлльтъ OAHPA_V ;
луннҍтъе:луннҍтъ OAHPA_V ;
ӣӈкхуввэ:ӣӈкхувв OAHPA_V ;
ме̄ррьдэ:ме̄ррьд OAHPA_V ;
куа̄шшкэ:куа̄шшк OAHPA_V ;
ка̄ццькэ:ка̄ццьк OAHPA_V ;
це̄ӆӆькэ:це̄ӆӆьк OAHPA_V ;
че̄ццклэ:че̄ццкл OAHPA_V ;
вуэсстлэ:вуэсстл OAHPA_V ;
це̄ҏҏтлэ:це̄ҏҏтл OAHPA_V ;
коа̄ввнэ:коа̄ввн OAHPA_V ;
ӣӈкхувнэ:ӣӈкхувн OAHPA_V ;
мя̄рркнэ:мя̄рркн OAHPA_V ;
по̄тткнэ:по̄тткн OAHPA_V ;
ца̄ввьнэ:ца̄ввьн OAHPA_V ;
ка̄рьксэ:ка̄рькс OAHPA_V ;
ся̄ххктэ:ся̄ххкт OAHPA_V ;
ва̄лльтэ:ва̄лльт OAHPA_V ;
вуэссьтэ:вуэссьт OAHPA_V ;
ка̄ххьтэ:ка̄ххьт OAHPA_V ;
ла̄ххьтэ:ла̄ххьт OAHPA_V ;
те̄ххьтэ:те̄ххьт OAHPA_V ;
найххьтэ:найххьт OAHPA_V ;
ве̄ӆӆьтэ:ве̄ӆӆьт OAHPA_V ;
куа̄шкхэ:куа̄шкх OAHPA_V ;
сӯррькхэ:сӯррькх OAHPA_V ;
те̄вьтхэ:те̄вьтх OAHPA_V ;
тӯлльтхэ:тӯлльтх OAHPA_V ;
ре̄ммьхэ:ре̄ммьх OAHPA_V ;
ва̄ннҍцле:ва̄ннҍцл OAHPA_V ;
то̄ӆӆькъе:то̄ӆӆькъ OAHPA_V ;
ӣӈӈклуввэ:ӣӈӈклувв OAHPA_V ;
нагьруввэ:нагьрувв OAHPA_V ;
е̄ллсуввэ:е̄ллсувв OAHPA_V ;
мӣллсуввэ:мӣллсувв OAHPA_V ;
по̄рсуввэ:по̄рсувв OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвхуввэ:тӣрвхувв OAHPA_V ;
вуайхуввэ:вуайхувв OAHPA_V ;
уййнхуввэ:уййнхувв OAHPA_V ;
вӯзьхуввэ:вӯзьхувв OAHPA_V ;
мӣльсыввэ:мӣльсывв OAHPA_V ;
ёадтсэллэ:ёадтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
куллтэллэ:куллтэлл OAHPA_V ;
вуэзхэллэ:вуэзхэлл OAHPA_V ;
кугкхэллэ:кугкхэлл OAHPA_V ;
эсстхэллэ:эсстхэлл OAHPA_V ;
томтсувнэ:томтсувн OAHPA_V ;
ёаххчедтэ:ёаххчедт OAHPA_V ;
чинндэдтэ:чинндэдт OAHPA_V ;
уййнлэдтэ:уййнлэдт OAHPA_V ;
тыввнэдтэ:тыввнэдт OAHPA_V ;
пэ̄знэдтэ:пэ̄знэдт OAHPA_V ;
копчнэдтэ:копчнэдт OAHPA_V ;
тӣрвхэдтэ:тӣрвхэдт OAHPA_V ;
ме̄ххьцтэ:ме̄ххьцт OAHPA_V ;
шэ̄ннтътэ:шэ̄ннтът OAHPA_V ;
моаӆӆьчхэ:моаӆӆьчх OAHPA_V ;
о̄ххпнуввэ:о̄ххпнувв OAHPA_V ;
вуэпьсуввэ:вуэпьсувв OAHPA_V ;
вуэдҍсуввэ:вуэдҍсувв OAHPA_V ;
кэ̄бптуввэ:кэ̄бптувв OAHPA_V ;
кырьйхуввэ:кырьйхувв OAHPA_V ;
вуэдтсэллэ:вуэдтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
мушштсэллэ:мушштсэлл OAHPA_V ;
ёаххчедтнэ:ёаххчедтн OAHPA_V ;
луэшштэдтэ:луэшштэдт OAHPA_V ;
оа̄ҏҏтэдтэ:оа̄ҏҏтэдт OAHPA_V ;
луннтнэнтэ:луннтнэнт OAHPA_V ;
тӣрваслуввэ:тӣрваслувв OAHPA_V ;
лӯшшьтлуввэ:лӯшшьтлувв OAHPA_V ;
тулльтсэллэ:тулльтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
ю̄ррьтсэллэ:ю̄ррьтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
по̄ҏҏтсэллэ:по̄ҏҏтсэлл OAHPA_V ;
тыввнаххьтэ:тыввнаххьт OAHPA_V ;
цырмшаххьтэ:цырмшаххьт OAHPA_V ;
ӣӈӈклаххьтӭ:ӣӈӈклаххьт OAHPA_V ;
вуаййлаххьтэ:вуаййлаххьт OAHPA_V ;
лыгкэшкуэдтӭ:лыгкэшкуэдт OAHPA_V ;
по̄рэшкуэдтӭ:по̄рэшкуэдт OAHPA_V ;
ро̄дтлаххьтӭ:ро̄дтлаххьт OAHPA_V ;
ре̄ввклаххьтэ:ре̄ввклаххьт OAHPA_V ;
суйпнэшкуэдтӭ:суйпнэшкуэдт OAHPA_V ;
са̄рнэшкуэдтӭ:са̄рнэшкуэдт OAHPA_V ;
ноа̄йххьтлэдтэ:ноа̄йххьтлэдт OAHPA_V ;
